Utah statutes.
76-2-301.   Person under fourteen years old not criminally responsible.
A person is not criminally responsible for conduct performed before he reaches
the age of fourteen years. This section shall in no way limit the jurisdiction
of or proceedings before the juvenile courts of this state.
